Oklahoma, session 2025, SB390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 2-5-204, as

amended by Section 4, Chapter 375, O.S.L. 2022 (10A O.S. Supp. 2024,

Section 2-5-204), is amended to read as follows:

Section 2-5-204. A. A child who is arrested for an offense

pursuant to subsection A, B, C, D, or E of Section 2-5-205 of this

title, may, depending on the child’s age and alleged crime, be

charged as a juvenile delinquent, youthful offender, or an adult.

If charged as a juvenile delinquent, a petition shall be filed. If

charged as a youthful offender or adult, an information shall be

Req. No. 1264 Page 1

file d. At any time after the child is charged as a youthful

offender or adult, the district attorney may dismiss the information

and file a juvenile delinquent petition.

B. If the child is not otherwise represented by counsel and

either the child, his or her parent, guardian, or next friend

requests an attorney prior to or during interrogation, or upon being

charged by information, as provided in subsection A of this section,

the court shall appoint an attorney, who shall not be a district

attorney, for the child regardless of any attempted waiver by the

parent, guardian, or next friend of the right to be represented by

counsel. If the court appoints an attorney for a child for the

interrogation or at the initial appearance, the court shall review

the appointment at a subsequent hearing to determine if the child,

parent, guardian, or next friend qualifies for a court-appointed

attorney.

C. When a person proceeds to trial as either a youthful

offender or as an adult as provided by the Youthful Offender Act,

the accused person shall have all the statutory and constitutional

rights and protections of an adult accused of a crime. All

proceedings shall be as for a criminal action and the provisions of

Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply, except as provided

for in the Youthful Offender Act.

D. All youthful offender court records for a person who is

certified to stand trial as an adult or youthful offender shall be

Req. No. 1264 Page 2

cons idered adult records and shall not be subject to the provisions

of Chapter 6 of the Oklahoma Juvenile Code; provided, however, all

reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits, or documents

regarding the educational history, mental health, or medical

treatment or condition of the person that are submitted to the court

or admitted into evidence during the hearing on the motion for

certification as a juvenile or a youthful offender or on the motion

for imposition of an adult sentence shall be confidential and shall

be filed or admitted under seal, except that such records shall be

provided to the Office of Juvenile Affairs. Any testimony regarding

the reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits, or documents

shall be given in camera and shall not be open to the general

public; provided, all persons having a direct interest in the case

as provided in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 2-2-402 of

this title shall be allowed to be present during the testimony but

shall be admonished not to discuss the testimony following the

hearing. All reports, evaluations, motions, records, exhibits, or

documents shall be released from under seal by order of the court if

the youthful offender is sentenced to the custody or supervision of

the Department of Corrections by the court pursuant to paragraph 1

of subsection B A of Section 2-5-209 2-5-208A or subsection B of

Section 2-5-210 2-5-210A of this title or if the juvenile or

youthful offender is later charged as an adult with a felony crime.



Req. No. 1264 Page 3

E. Proceedings against a youthful offender shall be heard by

any judge of the district court.

F. Upon arrest and detention of a person subject to the

provisions of the Youthful Offender Act, the person has the same

right to be released on bail as would an adult in the same

circumstances.

G. Upon a verdict of guilty or entry of a plea of guilty or

nolo contendere by a youthful offender who has been certified for

the imposition of an adult sentence as provided by Section 2-5-207

2-5-207A of this title, the person may be detained in an adult jail,

adult lockup, adult detention facility, or other adult facility if

that facility is licensed by the State Department of Health to

detain children under eighteen (18) years of age while the person is

awaiting housing by the Department of Corrections. In no event

shall a person who was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time

the offense was committed be sentenced to life imprisonment without

the possibility of parole or be given a mandatory minimum sentence

that carries a term of imprisonment that exceeds twenty (20) years.

H. A child or youthful offender shall be tried as an adult in

all subsequent criminal prosecutions, and shall not be subject to

the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a juvenile delinquent or

youthful offender processes in any further proceedings if:

1. The child or youthful offender has been certified to stand

trial as an adult pursuant to any certification procedure provided

Req. No. 1264 Page 4

by l aw and is subsequently convicted of the alleged offense or

against whom the imposition of judgment and sentence has been

deferred; or

2. The youthful offender has been certified for the imposition

of an adult sentence as provided by Section 2-5-207 2-5-207A of this

title and is subsequently convicted of the alleged offense or

against whom the imposition of judgment and sentencing has been

deferred.

I. Except as otherwise provided in the Youthful Offender Act, a

person who has been certified as a youthful offender shall be

prosecuted as a youthful offender in all subsequent criminal

proceedings until the youthful offender has attained eighteen (18)

years of age.

All proceedings for the commission of a crime committed after a

youthful offender has reached eighteen (18) years of age shall be

adult proceedings.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 985.1, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 985.1. A. When sentencing a person convicted of a

criminal offense for which there is a mandatory minimum sentence of

imprisonment, the court may depart from the applicable sentence if

the court finds substantial and compelling reasons on the record,

after giving due regard to the nature of the crime, history, and



Req. No. 1264 Page 5

char acter of the defendant and his or her chances of successful

rehabilitation, that:

1. The mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment is not

necessary for the protection of the public; or

2. Imposition of the mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment

would result in substantial injustice to the defendant; or

3. The mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment is not

necessary for the protection of the public and the defendant, based

on a risk and needs assessment, is eligible for an alternative

court, a diversion program, or community sentencing, without regard

to exclusions because of previous convictions, and has been accepted

to the same, pending sentencing.

B. The Except as provided in subsection D of this section, the

court shall not have the discretion to depart from the applicable

mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment on convictions for

criminal offenses under the following circumstances:

1. The offense for which the defendant was convicted is among

those crimes listed in Section 571 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma

Statutes as excepted from the definition of “nonviolent offense”;

2. The offense for which the defendant was convicted was a sex

offense and will require the defendant to register as a sex offender

pursuant to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act;

3. The offense for which the defendant was convicted involved

the use of a firearm;

Req. No. 1264 Page 6

4. The offense for which the defendant was convicted is a crime

listed in Section 13.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes

requiring the defendant to serve not less than eighty-five percent

(85%) of any sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system

prior to becoming eligible for consideration for parole;

5. The offense for which the defendant was convicted is a

violation of the Trafficking in Illegal Drugs Act as provided in

Sections 2-414 through 2-420 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

6. The defendant was the leader, manager, or supervisor of

others in a continuing criminal enterprise; or

7. The offense for which the defendant was convicted is a

violation of the Oklahoma Antiterrorism Act as provided in Sections

1268 through 1268.8 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

C. Any departure from the mandatory minimum sentence as

authorized in this section shall not reduce the sentence to less

than twenty-five percent (25%) of the mandatory term.

D. The court shall depart from the applicable mandatory minimum

sentence as required pursuant to subsection G of Section 2-5-204 of

Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-1264 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:53 PM





Req. No. 1264 Page 7